Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Chapter 7 Regional Development Authorities — Greater Nashville Regional Council
64-7-112. Operations.

The regional council shall adopt and operate under the following:

Subject to the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration, adopt statewide uniform travel regulations, and the regional council shall reimburse its officers and employees for official travel in conformance with such regulations;

Develop a system of competitive bidding on purchases of supplies and equipment and other contracts and submit the written procedures governing such system to the state procurement commission for approval;

Develop written personnel procedures to be filed with the commissioner of finance and administration for the hiring, promotion, demotion and dismissal of all employees and shall include an employee compensation plan based on a salary comparability analysis that takes into account state salary schedules, local government salary schedules and regional private market variations; and

Submit, annually, to the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives and to the office of legislative budget analysis a work program and budget, including an executive summary of the regional council's work program and budget.

Acts 1988, ch. 886, § 1; 2010, ch. 1030, § 15; 2011, ch. 295, § 19; 2016, ch. 797, § 16.